Maryland, session 2026, HB1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) through (g) of this section, the clerks of
the District Court shall:
(1) Collect costs, fines, forfeitures, or penalties imposed by the court; and
(2) Remit them to the State under a system agreed upon by the Chief Judge
of the District Court and the Comptroller.
(f) (1) (I) 1. A citation issued under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law
Article IN BALTIMORE CITY shall provide that the person receiving the citation may elect
to stand trial by notifying the Baltimore City Department of Public Works of the person’s

HOUSE BILL 1116 3
intention to stand trial at least 5 days prior to the date of payment as set forth in the
citation.
2. On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the Baltimore City
Department of Public Works shall forward to the District Court having venue a copy of the
citation and a copy of the notice from the person who received the citation indicating the
person’s intention to stand trial.
3. On receipt [thereof] OF THE COPY OF THE CITATION
AND COPY OF THE NOTICE, the District Court shall schedule the case for trial and notify
the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge of the District
Court.
(II) 1. A CITATION ISSUED UNDER § 10–112 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE IN HOWARD COUNTY SHALL PROVIDE THAT THE PERSON
RECEIVING THE CITATION MAY ELECT TO STAND TRIAL BY NOTIFYING THE DISTRICT
COURT OF THE PERSON’S INTENTION TO STAND TRIAL AT LEAST 5 DAYS PRIOR TO
THE DATE OF PAYMENT AS SET FORTH IN THE CITATION.
2. ON RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE, THE DISTRICT COURT
SHALL SCHEDULE THE CASE FOR TRIAL AND NOTIFY THE DEFENDANT OF THE TRIAL
DATE UNDER PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT
COURT.
(2) A citation issued as a result of the use of a surveillance system shall
provide that, in an uncontested case, the penalty shall be paid directly to Baltimore City
OR HOWARD COUNTY, AS APPLICABLE.
(3) Civil penalties collected by the District Court resulting from citations
issued as a result of the use of a surveillance system shall be collected in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section and distributed to Baltimore City OR HOWARD COUNTY, AS
APPLICABLE.
Article – Criminal Law
10–110.
(c) A person may not:
(1) dispose of litter on a highway or perform an act that violates the State
Vehicle Laws regarding disposal of litter, glass, and other prohibited substances on
highways; or
(2) dispose or cause or allow the disposal of litter on public or private
property unless:

HOUSE BILL 1116
(i) the property is designated by the State, a unit of the State, or a
political subdivision of the State for the disposal of litter and the person is authorized by
the proper public authority to use the property; or
(ii) the litter is placed into a litter receptacle or container installed
on the property.
10–112.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Department” means:
(I) IN BALTIMORE CITY, the Baltimore City Department of
Housing and Community Development, or another department designated by the Mayor of
Baltimore City; OR
(II) IN HOWARD COUNTY, THE HOWARD COUNTY POLICE
DEPARTMENT OR OTHER DEPARTMENT DESIGNATED BY THE HOWARD COUNTY
EXECUTIVE.
(3) “Dumping site” means a location in Baltimore City OR HOWARD
COUNTY that is:
(i) owned by the city, HOWARD COUNTY, or the State; and
(ii) identified by the Department as property that has been
repeatedly used for the disposal of litter in violation of State law or a local law or ordinance.
(4) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a
lessee of a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. a motor vehicle rental or leasing company; or
2. a holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of the Transportation Article.
(5) “Surveillance image” means an image recorded by a surveillance
system:
(i) on:
1. a photograph;

HOUSE BILL 1116 5
2. a micrograph;
3. an electronic image;
4. videotape; or
5. any other medium;
(ii) showing the front or rear of a motor vehicle, and, on at least one
image or portion of the tape, clearly identifying the registration plate number of the motor
vehicle; and
(iii) showing an individual committing a violation of the State illegal
dumping and litter control law or a local law or ordinance relating to the unlawful disposal
of litter.
(6) “Surveillance system” means a collection of one or more cameras located
at a dumping site that produces a surveillance image.
(b) This section applies to a violation of the State illegal dumping and litter
control law or a local law or ordinance relating to the unlawful disposal of litter that occurs
at a dumping site monitored by a surveillance system.
(c) The Department may:
(1) place surveillance systems at dumping sites; and
(2) use surveillance images to enforce the provisions of the State illegal
dumping and litter control law or a local law or ordinance relating to the unlawful disposal
of litter.
(d) (1) Unless the individual committing a violation received a citation from a
police officer at the time of the violation, the owner of the vehicle used to commit the
violation, or in accordance with subsection (g)(4) of this section, the individual committing
the violation, is subject to a civil penalty if the violation and the motor vehicle used to
commit the violation are recorded on a surveillance image by a surveillance system while
the individual is committing a violation of the State illegal dumping and litter control law
or a local law or ordinance relating to the unlawful disposal of litter.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $1,000.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court, in consultation with the
Department, shall prescribe:
(i) a uniform citation form consistent with subsection (e)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and

HOUSE BILL 1116
(ii) a civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(e) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (4) of this
subsection, the Department shall mail to the owner liable under subsection (d) of this
section a citation that shall include:
(i) the name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(ii) the registration number of the motor vehicle involved in the
violation;
(iii) the violation charged;
(iv) the location where the violation occurred;
(v) the date and time of the violation;
(vi) a copy of the surveillance image;
(vii) the amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty must be paid;
(viii) a signed statement by a duly authorized agent of the Department
that, based on inspection of surveillance images, the motor vehicle was being used by an
individual who was committing a violation of the State illegal dumping and litter control
law or a local law or ordinance relating to the unlawful disposal of litter;
(ix) a statement that surveillance images are evidence of a violation
of the State illegal dumping and litter control law or a local law or ordinance relating to the
unlawful disposal of litter;
(x) information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the citation may be contested
in the District Court; and
(xi) information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability in a timely manner:
1. is an admission of liability;
2. may result in the refusal by the Motor Vehicle
Administration to register the motor vehicle; and
3. may result in the suspension of the motor vehicle
registration.

HOUSE BILL 1116 7
(2) The Department may mail a warning notice instead of a citation to the
owner liable under subsection (d) of this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (g)(4) of this section, the Department
may not mail a citation to a person who is not an owner.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (g)(4) of this section, a citation issued
under this section shall be mailed no later than 2 weeks after the alleged violation.
(5) A person who receives a citation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may:
(i) pay the civil penalty, in accordance with the instructions on the
citation, directly to Baltimore City OR HOWARD COUNTY, AS APPLICABLE; or
(ii) elect to stand trial in the District Court for the alleged violation.
(f) (1) A certificate alleging that a violation of the State illegal dumping and
litter control law or a local law or ordinance relating to the unlawful disposal of litter
occurred, sworn to or affirmed by a duly authorized agent of the Department, based on
inspection of surveillance images produced by a surveillance system, shall be evidence of
the facts contained in the certificate and shall be admissible in a proceeding alleging a
violation under this section.
(2) Adjudication of liability shall be based on a preponderance of the
evidence.
(g) (1) The District Court may consider in defense of a violation:
(i) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, that:
1. the motor vehicle was stolen before the violation occurred
and was not under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the violation; or
2. the registration plates of the motor vehicle were stolen
before the violation occurred and were not under the control or possession of the owner at
the time of the violation;
(ii) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, evidence that the
person named in the citation was not the person in the surveillance image committing the
violation of the State illegal dumping and litter control law or a local law or ordinance
relating to the unlawful disposal of litter; and
(iii) any other issues and evidence that the District Court deems
pertinent.

HOUSE BILL 1116
(2) In order to assert a defense under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection,
the owner shall submit proof that a police report regarding the stolen motor vehicle or
registration plates was filed in a timely manner.
(3) In order to satisfy the evidentiary burden under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the person named in the citation shall provide to the District Court evidence to
the satisfaction of the court of the identity of the person in the surveillance image who was
actually committing the violation, including, at a minimum, the person’s name and current
address.
(4) (i) If the District Court finds that the person named in the citation
did not commit the violation or receives evidence under paragraph (3) of this subsection
identifying the person who committed the violation, the clerk of the court shall provide the
Department with a copy of any evidence substantiating who was operating the vehicle at
the time of the violation.
(ii) On receipt of substantiating evidence from the District Court
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Department may issue a citation as provided
in subsection (e) of this section to the person that the evidence indicates committed the
violation.
(iii) A citation issued under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall
be mailed no later than 2 weeks after the receipt of the evidence from the District Court.
(h) If the person named in the citation does not pay the civil penalty and does not
contest the violation, the Motor Vehicle Administration may:
(1) refuse to register the motor vehicle cited in the violation; or
(2) suspend the registration of the motor vehicle cited in the violation.
(i) A violation for which a civil penalty is imposed under this section:
(1) may not be recorded by the Motor Vehicle Administration on the driving
record of the owner or the driver of the motor vehicle; and
(2) may be treated as a parking violation for purposes of § 26–305 of the
Transportation Article.
(j) In consultation with the Department, the Chief Judge of the District Court
shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, the trial of civil violations, and the
collection of civil penalties under this section.
Article – General Provisions
4–322.

HOUSE BILL 1116 9
(a) In this section, “surveillance image” has the meaning stated in § 10–112 of the
Criminal Law Article.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian of a
surveillance image shall deny inspection of the surveillance image.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of a surveillance image:
(1) by any person issued a citation under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law
Article, or by an attorney of record for the person; or
(2) by an employee or agent of the Baltimore City Department of Housing
and Community Development OR OF THE HOWARD COUNTY DEPARTMENT
DESIGNATED UNDER § 10–112 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE in an investigation or
a proceeding relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under §
10–112 of the Criminal Law Article.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Baltimore City Department
of Housing and Community Development AND THE HOWARD COUNTY DEPARTMENT
DESIGNATED UNDER § 10–112 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE may publicly
disseminate a surveillance image as part of an investigation.
Article – Transportation
26–305.
(a) The Administration may not register or transfer the registration of any vehicle
involved in a parking violation under this subtitle, a violation under any federal parking
regulation that applies to property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S.
government, a violation of § 21–202(h) of this article as determined under § 21–202.1 of this
article or Title 21, Subtitle 8 of this article as determined under § 21–809 or § 21–810 of
this article, or a violation of the Illegal Dumping and Litter Control Law under § 10–110 of
the Criminal Law Article or a local law or ordinance adopted by Baltimore City OR
HOWARD COUNTY relating to the unlawful disposal of litter as determined under §
10–112 of the Criminal Law Article, if:
(1) It is notified by a political subdivision or authorized State agency that
the person cited for the violation under this subtitle, § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of
this article, or § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to either:
(i) Pay the fine for the violation by the date specified in the citation;
or
(ii) File a notice of his intention to stand trial for the violation;

HOUSE BILL 1116
(2) It is notified by the District Court that a person who has elected to stand
trial for the violation under this subtitle, under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of this
article, or under § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to appear for
trial; or
(3) It is notified by a U.S. District Court that a person cited for a violation
under a federal parking regulation:
(i) Has failed to pay the fine for the violation by the date specified
in the federal citation; or
(ii) Either has failed to file a notice of the person’s intention to stand
trial for the violation, or, if electing to stand trial, has failed to appear for trial.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2031,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.